Illinois, session 104th, SB698.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Epinephrine Injector Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 27/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Epinephrine Injector Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-711, eff. 1-1-17; 100-799, eff. 1-1-19.)